Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-517
County clerk; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

Except as provided in section 22-417, a county clerk shall be elected in each county having a population of four hundred thousand inhabitants or less at the statewide general election in 1994 and each four years thereafter and in counties having a population in excess of four hundred thousand inhabitants at the statewide general election in 1996 and each four years thereafter. The county clerk shall meet the qualifications found in sections 23-1301 and 23-3203 if applicable. The county clerk shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 113;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 44.